Utah statutes.
71-7-4.   Veterans' Memorial Park Board -- Members -- Appointment --
Meetings -- Per diem.
(1)  There is created a Veterans' Memorial Park Board to serve as an advisory
body to the Department of Veterans' Affairs on matters relating to the
establishment and operation of a veterans' cemetery and memorial park.
(2)  The board shall consist of the following five members:
(a)  one representative recommended by the state commander of the Veterans of
Foreign Wars;
(b)  one representative recommended by the state commander of the American
Legion;
(c)  one representative recommended by the state commander of the Disabled
American Veterans;
(d)  the director of the Department of Veterans' Affairs; and
(e)  one person not affiliated with any of the organizations referred to in
this Subsection (2).
(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), the governor shall appoint
members in Subsections (2)(a), (b), (c), and (e) above for four-year terms.
The governor shall make final appointments to the board by June 30 of any year
in which appointments are to be made under this chapter.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(c)  All members shall serve until their successors are appointed.
(d)  Members may not serve more than two consecutive terms.
(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original
appointment.
(5) (a)  The board shall select a chair annually from among its members at its
first meeting after July 1.
(b)  Three members of the board constitute a quorum to transact business.
(c)  The board shall meet at least quarterly on a regular date fixed by the
board.
(d)  The chair or three members of the board may call additional meetings.
(6)  The board shall provide copies of all minutes and an annual report of its
activities by June 30 of each year to the Veterans' Advisory Council created
in Section 71-8-4.
(7) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees shall receive no
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member’s official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the board at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
